dictsource/lv_rules
.group og
     anal) og              o:g
       bl) og              og
       _d) og (L01_        og        // dogs
        d) og (m           og
       er) og              og
     herc) og              o:g
       _j) og (L01_        o:g       // jogs
        j) og              og
        k) og (n           og
       kr) og              uog
        l) og (ar          og
       _l) og (L01_        uog       // logs
        l) ogo (@          ogo
           ogo             uoguo
      osm) og              og
       pr) og (L68         og
       pr) ogno (L90L05_   ogno:     // ..prognoze
       sl) og (L01_        uog       // slogs
       sl) og (o           uog       // slogot
      _sm) og (L01_        o:g       // smogs
      spr) og              uog
     sten) og              og
       šl) og (L01_        uog       // (iekš)log
      _vl) og (L01_        og        // vlogs

.group oi
       _b) oikot           oikot
           oi              oi

.group oj
     _bar) oj (L13_        uoj       // todo barot should be handled better
       _b) oj (a_+         oj        // _boja_
        b) oj (ā           uoj
       _b) oj (L04_        uo`j      // boja with short uo because of ambiguity
  _enkurb) oj (L04_        oj        // enkurboja
       _k) oj (L04         oj        // koja
        l) oj (L50         oj
      _ob) oj (L04_        oj        // oboja
        _) oj (ārL01_      oj        // Ojārs
           oj (is_         uoj
      _pr) oj (ām_         uoj
       pr) oj (ek          o`j
       pr) oj (L42         oj
      _tr) oj (L04_        oj        // Troja
        z) oj (L01_+       oj        // ..zojs

.group ok
       ad) ok              ok
      adv) ok              ok
       ap) ok              ok
      apr) ok              uok
      bar) ok (L01_        ok        // baroks
     _bar) ok (L77L02_     uok       // baroklis
       bl) ok              ok
        b) ok (s           ok
      _br) ok (ātL01_      ok        // brokāts
     ciet) ok              uok
        c) okol            okol
       _d) ok (L01_        ok        // doks
        d) ok (u           ok
      fil) okok            okok
       gl) ok (sīn         ok
        g) ok              ok
       _k) okako (lL04_    okako:    // kokakola
        k) ok (L01         uo`k      // koks with short uo, because of ambiguity
        k) ok (og          uok
        k) okosL01         okos
        k) ok (tēl         uok
      _kr) oko (dilL01_    oko       // krokodils
       kr) ok (o           uok       // ..kroko..
        l) ok (al          ok
        l) ok (āc          ok
        l) okomo           okomo
       _n) ok (ia_         ok        // Nokia
        n) ok (L61         ok
           ok (āl          ok
           ok (e           ok
           okokL01_        okok      // ..okoks
        _) ok (sanL04_     ok        // Oksana
           ok (si          ok
           ok (sol         ok
           ok (t           ok
           ok (to          ok
           ok (ul          ok
           ok (up          ok
    ortod) ok              ok
     plut) ok              ok
       pr) ok              ok
     prot) oko             oko:
       _r) ok (ādL05_      ok        // rokāde
        r) ok (L04_        uok       // ..roka
        r) ok (a_          uo`k      // _roka_
        r) ok (m           ok
        r) okope           oko:pe
        r) ok (tu          uok
       sm) ok              uok
        s) ok (o           ok
        s) ok (r           ok
        š) ok              ok
       _t) ok (ijL04_      ok        // Tokija
        t) ok (s           ok
    _ulbr) ok (L04_        ok        // Ulbroka
        v) ok (a           ok
        ž) ok (ej          ok

.group ol
      abs) ol              ol
    aeros) ol              o:l
       an) ol              ol
      ant) ol              ol
       ap) ol              ol
     _arn) ol (dL01_       ol-       // Arnolds
     _ask) ol (dL01_       ol-       // Askolds
       āb) ol (++          uol
      bem) ol (L01_        o:l       // bemols
       _b) ol (īdL01_      ol        // bolīds
       _b) ol (īL12_       uol       // bolīt
       _b) ol (īšanL08_    uol       // bolīšanās
       _b) ol (L13_        uol
       _b) ol              ol
        b) ol              o:l
       _b) ol (ošL01_      uol       // bološs
        c) ol (L05_        o:l
        c) ol (l           oll
       _d) ol (ārL01_      ol        // dolārs
       ep) ol              ol
       ev) ol              ol
       _f) ol (ijL04_      o:l       // folija
     gond) ol              o:l
       iz) ol (+           ol
        k) ol (ab          ol
        k) ol (ā           ol
       _k) ol (L01_        o:l       // kols
        k) ol (L04_        o:l       // kola
        k) ol (L51         ol
        k) ol (L52         ol
        k) olo (n          olo
        k) ol (o           ol
        k) ol (p           ol
        k) ol (s           ol
     L33p) ol (it          ol
       _l) ol (itL04_      ol        // Lolita
        l) oloj  (L13_     uoluoj
        l) olo (L12_       uoluo     // lolot
     mand) ol              ol
     mauz) ol              ol
        m) ol (d           ol
        m) ol (e           ol
        m) ol (i           ol
       _m) ol (L01_        o:l       // mols
        m) ol (u           ol
        n) ol (ik          uol
           ol (eo          ol
        _) olal            olal      // olallā
        _) ol (gL04_       ol        // Olga
           ol (ig          ol
           ol (imp         ol
           ol (īv          ol
        _) ol (L04_+       uol       // ola
           ol (oL66        ol
        p) ol (em          ol
       _p) ol (ied         ol
       _p) ol (ie          uol
       _p) ol (ijL04_+     uol       // Polija
       _p) ol (kL04_       ol        // polka
       _p) ol (L01_+       o:l       // pols
        p) ol (L01_        o:l       // ..pols
        p) ol (L05_        o:l       // ..pole
        p) ol (L50         ol
        p) ol (L52+        ol
        p) ol (o           ol
        p) olo (_          o:lo:     // ..polo
        p) ol (st          ol
        p) ol (šL01_       ol        // polšs
       pr) ol (e           ol
      ras) ol              ol
        r) ol              ol
      sīp) ol (+           uol
       sk) ol (L04_+       uol       // ..skola
       sk) olo             uoluo     // ..skolo..
       sk) ol (+           uol
        s) ol (id          ol
        s) ol (ist         o:l
        s) ol (īdā         ol
      L93) ol (īd          ol        // (s/z)olīds
        s) ol (īL61        uol       // ..solīt../..solīd..
        s) ol (L01_        uol       // sols
        s) ol (L50r        ol
        s) ol (oģ          ol
        s) olo (L88        uoluo
        s) olo (L88_       uoluo
        s) ol (o           o:l
        s) ol (st          ol
        s) ol (t           ol
        s) ol (v           ol
    _spīd) ol (L04_        uol       // Spīdola
        t) ol (er          ol
        t) ol (L01_        o:l       // tols
        t) ol (L04_+       o:l       // ..tola
       _t) olsto (jL01_    olsto     // Tolstojs
     _vit) ol (dL01_       ol        // Vitolds
      vīt) ol (L01_+       uol       // ..vītols
        v) ol (d           ol
        v) ol (ej          ol
        v) ol (t           ol
        v) ol (u           ol
      zīm) ol              uol
        z) ol (it          ol
       @z) ol (L01_        o:l       // ..zols
        z) ol (L05_        uol      // ..zole

.group om
       an) om              om
       at) om              o:m
      aut) om              om
        b) om (b           om
        b) om (zL02_       om        // bomzis
       br) om              om
        c) om (_           om
       _č) om (L01_        om
        d) om (in          om
        d) om (nL04_       om        // domna
       dr) om (L01_        o:m       // ..droms
       gl) om              om
        k) om (iL67        o:m
        k) om (isk         o:m
        k) om (L04_+       o:m       // koma
        k) om              om
        k) omo             omo
        k) ompo            ompo
       _l) omonoso (vL01_  omon'oso  // Lomonosovs
      mel) om              om
        m) om (ent         om
       nd) om (L01_        o:m
        n) om (en          om
        n) om (ijL04_      o:m       // ..nomija
        n) om (inL50       om
        n) om (inL51       om
        n) om (L01_        o:m       // ..noms
        n) om (L04_        uom       // ..noma
        n) om (L05_        o:m       // ..nome
        n) omod            uomuod
           om (ār          om
        _) omb             omb       // ombutsmens
        _) omeg            omeg      // omega
        _) oml             oml       // omlete
        _) omul            omul      // omulīgs
        _) om (L05_        o:m       // ome
        _) omīt (L05_      o:mi:t    // omīte
        _) omamm (L04_     o:mamm    // omamma
           om (nib         om
           omot (o         omot
        _) om (s           o:m
     pārd) om (+           uom
       pl) om              om
        p) om (er          om
        p) om (p           om
      _pr) om (b           uom       // prombūtne
      _pr) omejo           uomejuo
      _pr) om (es          uom       // promesošs
       pr) om              om
      _pr) omo             omo:
      _pr) om (_           uom       // prom
       pt) om (L01_        o:m       // ..ptoms
       pt) om              o>m
       rd) om (L01_        o:m
        r) om (b           om
       _r) om (L04_        uom       // Roma
        r) om (L50         om
       st) om (at          om
        t) om (as          om
       _t) om (ātL01_      om        // tomāts
        t) om (ij          o:m
        t) omo             omo
       tr) om              om
